District of Columbia statutes.
9-304

Pennsylvania Avenue Bridge.

The East Washington Heights Traction Railroad Company shall bear the cost of maintenance, construction, and repair of the Pennsylvania Avenue Bridge over the Anacostia River in like manner and under the same conditions as are provided by § 9-303.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 636, ch. 1360
Jan. 14, 1933, 47 Stat. 759, ch. 10, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-504.
1973 Ed., § 7-504.